Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2490
Individual liability of personal representative.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a personal representative is not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in his fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless he fails to reveal his representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.

(b) A personal representative is individually liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the estate only if he is personally at fault.

(c) Claims based on contracts entered into by a personal representative in his fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate or on torts committed in the course of estate administration, may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the personal representative in his fiduciary capacity, whether or not the personal representative is individually liable therefor.

(d) Issues of liability as between the estate and the personal representative individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge or indemnification or other appropriate proceeding.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 168, UPC § 3-808.

Under subsection (a) of this section, it is the personal representative's duty to disclose his or her representative capacity in order to avoid personal liability in contract, and the personal representative bears the burden of proof on this issue. Purbaugh v. Jurgensmeier, 240 Neb. 679, 483 N.W.2d 757 (1992).